Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB113.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5(a) of the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 5. Proposed regulations; procedures for review.(a) On the same date that an agency submits a proposed regulation to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication of notice of proposed rulemaking in the Pennsylvania Bulletin as required by the Commonwealth Documents Law, the agency shall submit to the commission and the committees a copy of the proposed regulation and a regulatory analysis form which includes the following:* * *1234567891011121314151617181920 (10.2) For any proposed regulation that deals in any way with the production, transportation or use of any form of fuel, energy or electricity, or that may possibly have any impact on the price of electricity, an analysis of any way in which the regulation could possibly increase electricity costs, even if only temporarily or over a longer time span, and a discussion of how this may negatively impact low-income residents.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0113PN0091 - 2 - 12345678910